src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON GEAVNNIS-OBL
               +Sg+Nom:X4      K     ;
                  +Ess:X4in    K     ;
      CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8      RHyph ;
              CmpN/SgN:X4      RHyph ;
               +Sg+Gen:Y5      K     ;
             +CmpN/SgG:Y5      RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:Y5      K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:Y5j     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:Y5s     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:Y5n     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:Y5jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:Y5t     K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:Y5jd    K     ;
             +CmpN/PlG:jd      RHyph ;
               +Pl+Acc:Y5jd    K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:Y5jde   K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:Y5jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:Y5jgujn K     ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-OBL_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Nom:X4   K     ;
                  +Ess:X4in K     ;
      CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8   RHyph ;
              CmpN/SgN:X4   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Gen:Y5   K     ;
             +CmpN/SgG:Y5   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:Y5   K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:Y5j  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:Y5s  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:Y5n  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:Y5jn K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:Y5t K ;
!+Pl+Gen:Y5jd K ;
!+CmpN/PlG:jd RHyph ;
!+Pl+Acc:Y5jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:Y5jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:Y5jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:Y5jgujn K ;

LEXICON BALAK-plc !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@k DenominalAdjsC2     ;

LEXICON BALAK-fem !singulars on -k
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:@U.Cap.Obl@k  #           ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON BALAK-org !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BALAK-sur !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASE ;

LEXICON BALAK-UCASE
               +Sg+Nom:k       K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:k       RHyph ;
         +Attr+Use/Sub:k       K     ; !
                  +Ess:gin     K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:gat     K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:gijdda  K     ; ! 2-syll stem
               +Sg+Gen:ga      K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:k       K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:k       RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgG:ga      RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:ga      K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:k       K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:gij     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:gis     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:gin     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:gijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:gijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:gijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:gijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:gijguin K     ;

LEXICON BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Nom:k    K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:k    RHyph ;
         +Attr+Use/Sub:k    K     ; !
                  +Ess:gin  K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:gat K ;
!+Pl+Ill:gijdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
               +Sg+Gen:ga   K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:k    K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:k    RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgG:ga   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:ga   K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:k    K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:gij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:gis  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:gin  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:gijn K     ;
!+Pl+Gen:gijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:gijd K ;
!+Pl+Loc:gijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:gijguin K ;


LEXICON SARAK-fem !Sarak:Sarahis
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  SARAK-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@k #           ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SARAK-plc !singulars on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  SARAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@k DenominalAdjsC2     ;


LEXICON SARAK-UCASE
               +Sg+Nom:k       K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:k       RHyph ;
         +Attr+Use/Sub:k       K     ; !
                  +Ess:hin     K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:hat     K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:hijdda  K     ; ! 2-syll stem
               +Sg+Gen:ha      K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:k       K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:k       RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgG:ha      RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:ha      K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:k       K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:hij     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:his     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:hin     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:hijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:hijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:hijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:hijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:hijguin K     ;

LEXICON SARAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Nom:k    K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:k    RHyph ;
         +Attr+Use/Sub:k    K     ; !
                  +Ess:hin  K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:hat K ;
!+Pl+Ill:hijdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
               +Sg+Gen:ha   K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:k    K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:k    RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgG:ha   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:ha   K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:k    K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:hij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:his  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:hin  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:hijn K     ;
!+Pl+Gen:hijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:hijd K ;
!+Pl+Loc:hijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:hijguin K ;


! Plural lexica
! -------------
LEXICON VARGGAT-plc
                              +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>               VARGGATDECL     ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:X4@U.Cap.Opt@    VUONAT          ;
                   @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4t@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;

LEXICON VARGGAT-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGATDECL
! As aleuhtat, but with a marginal leakage
! to sg forms in some cases. (substandard?)
                                           ALEUHTATDECL ; ! Default.
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:ha@U.Cap.Obl@  K            ; ! Várggáha   !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:his@U.Cap.Obl@ K            ; ! Várggáhis !

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-plc
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>               ALEUHTATDECL    ;
         @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4t@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Opt@    DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;

LEXICON ALEUHTATDECL
   ALEUHTAT-UCASE ;

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-UCASE
    +Ess:n     K            ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t   K            ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jde K            ; ! 2-syll stem
     +Pl:X5    ALEUHTAT-OBL ;

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-OBL ! 2-syll stem
 +Gen:jd    K ;
 +Acc:jd    K ;
 +Loc:jn    K ;
 +Com:jgujn K ;


LEXICON SULLOT-plc
                              +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              SULLOTDECL      ;
                   @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
           @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT          ;

LEXICON SULLOT-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> SULLOTDECL ;

LEXICON SULLOTDECL
   SULLOT-OBL ;

LEXICON SULLOT-OBL
    +Ess:X4n   K            ;
 +Pl+Nom:Y5t   K            ;
 +Pl+Ill:Y6jde K            ; ! 2-syll stem
     +Pl:Y6    ALEUHTAT-OBL ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-plc
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              EATNAMATDECL    ;
         @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X2@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Opt@   DenominalAdjsC3 ; !


LEXICON EATNAMAT-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> EATNAMATDECL ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> EATNAMATDECL ;

LEXICON EATNAMATDECL
   EATNAMAT-OBL ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-OBL
        +Ess:X4in  K            ;
 +Ess+Use/NG:X7in  K            ;
     +Pl+Nom:X2at  K            ;
     +Pl+Ill:ijdda K            ; ! 3-syll stem
         +Pl:X2i   ALEUHTAT-OBL ;
