src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Barruk:Barru BALAK-sur ;
Bealgeoaivvit:Bealge^oaj'vi VARGGAT-plc ;
Bermudasullot:Bermuda^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Borsejávrrit:Borse^jáv'ri VARGGAT-plc ;
Buolbmát+Use/Sub:Buolbmá BALAK-plc ; !
Guovtti% Ovllá% bealkinláddot:Guovtti% Ovllá% bealkin^láddu SULLOT-plc ;
Bálák:Bálá BALAK-plc ;
Coagalmjávrrit:Coagalm^jáv'ri VARGGAT-plc ;
Davvikalohttagilvvut:Davvi^kalohtta^gil'vu VARGGAT-obj ;
Dieđut:Dieh'tu ALEUHTAT-obj ;
Dieđut+Use/Sub:Dieh'tu SULLOT-obj ;
Ditnuidluobbalat:Ditnuid^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ;
Doggeráhppát:Dogge^ráhppá SULLOT-plc ;
Dálmmát:Dálbmá VARGGAT-plc ;
Dápmotjávrrit:Dápmot^jáv'ri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Dávggát:Dáv'gá VARGGAT-obj ;
Eisevárverddet:Eise^vár^verdde ALEUHTAT-org ;
Fearasullot+Use/Sub:Fear^suollu SULLOT-plc ; !
Nástemánát:Náste^mánná VARGGAT-obj ;
Gallanuorat:Galla^nuorra VARGGAT-org ;
Gazzačuohppanoaivvit:Gazza^čuohppan^oaj'vi VARGGAT-plc ;
Verddemárkanat:Verddemárkan EATNAMAT-obj ;
Verddespábbačiekčamat:Verdde^spábba^čiekčam EATNAMAT-obj ;
Verddečiekčamat:Verdde^čiekčam EATNAMAT-obj ;
Beaivváščiekčamat:Beaivváš^čiekčam EATNAMAT-obj ;
Beaskáđasčuoigamat:Beaskáđas^čuoigam EATNAMAT-obj ;
SM-čuoigamat:SM-čuoigam EATNAMAT-obj ;
OG-sáttatčuoigamat:OG-sáttat#čuoigam EATNAMAT-obj ;
OG-sáttačuoigamat:OG-sátta#čuoigam EATNAMAT-obj ;
Ginalváre% čuoigamat:Ginalváre% čuoigam EATNAMAT-obj ;
NM-heargevuodjimat:NM-hearge#vuodji7m EATNAMAT-obj ;
Geavgŋasašsullot:Geavgŋasaš^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Gieddeluobbalat:Giedde^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ;
Giellačállosat:Giella^čállus EATNAMAT-obj ;
Gierdduidjávrrit:Gierdduid^jáv'ri VARGGAT-plc ;
Gottorláddot:Gottor^láddu SULLOT-plc ;
Guorpak:Guorpa BALAK-plc ;
Láhkonieiddat:Láhko^niej'da VARGGAT-org ;
Gussabávttit:Gussa^bák'ti ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Sáhpángillargánddat:Sáhpángillargán'da VARGGAT-org ;
Sáhpángillárgánddat:Sáhpángillárgán'da VARGGAT-org ;
Gáissát:Gáj'sá VARGGAT-plc ;
Gállábártnit:Gállá^bárdni VARGGAT-obj ;
Gállábártnit+Use/Sub:Gálla^bárdni VARGGAT-obj ;
Gállatláddot:Gállat^láddu SULLOT-plc ; !FIN
Harrok:Harro SARAK-plc ;
Heandaratláddot:Heandarat^láddu SULLOT-plc ; !FIN
Hearjjak:Hearjja BALAK-plc ; !Herjangen
Hárreluobbalat:Hárre^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Hávgajávrrit:Hávga^jáv'ri ALEUHTAT-plc ; !FIN
Iešjot% lunttat:Ieš^jot% lun'ta VARGGAT-org ;
Iešjárlunttat:Ieš^jár^lun'ta VARGGAT-obj ;
Jiepmak:Jiepma BALAK-plc ;
Johtteluobbalat:Johtte^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Juovvačohkat:Juovva^čohkka ALEUHTAT-plc ; !FIN
Lákkosearat:Lákko^searra ALEUHTAT-org ;
Stálusearat:Stálu^searra ALEUHTAT-org ;
Lákkosearat+Use/Sub:Lakko^searra ALEUHTAT-org ;
Lisačomat:Lisa^čopma ALEUHTAT-plc ; !FIN
Livlanráhppát:Livlan^ráhppá SULLOT-plc ;
Loabák:Loabá BALAK-plc ;
Luopmošjohguolbanat:Luopmoš^joh^guolban EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Láttegeađggit:Látte^geađ'gi ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Máhkirjávrrit:Máhkir^jáv'ri VARGGAT-plc ;
Málák:Málá BALAK-org ;
Märak:Mära BALAK-sur ;
Njallavárláddot:Njalla^vár^láddu SULLOT-plc ; !FIN
Njoammeloailuobbalat:Njoammel^oai^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Njoammelvárit:Njoammel^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ; !FIN
Oaivvošvárluobbalat:Oaivvoš^vár^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Rahák:Rahá BALAK-plc ;
Reavččajávrrit:Reavčča^jáv'ri ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Rivtták:Rivttá BALAK-plc ;
Ruksesjávrrit:Rukses^jáv'ri VARGGAT-plc ;
Sarak:Sara BALAK-fem ;
Sarak:Sara SARAK-fem ;
Sattaluobbalat:Satta^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Siellak:Siella BALAK-plc ;
Signysullot:Signy^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Varraheajat:Varrahead'ja VARGGAT-obj ;
Skiellet+Use/Sub:Skielle ALEUHTAT-plc ; !
Skáideluobbalat:Skáide^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Smihtaskasat:Smihtaskassa ALEUHTAT-obj ;
Snolkkuk:Snolkku BALAK-plc ;
Spárárat:Spárár EATNAMAT-org ;
Suolojávrrit:Suolo^jáv'ri VARGGAT-plc ;
Ságat:Sáh'ka VARGGAT-org ;
Sállanhasat:Sállanhassa ALEUHTAT-org ;
Sálteluobbalat:Sálte^luobbal EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Sámi% Jienat:Sámi% Jietna VARGGAT-obj ;
Sáttát:Sáttá ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Lákkonieiddat:Lákko^niej'da VARGGAT-org ;
Vuorká-Dávvirat:Vuorká-Dávvi7r EATNAMAT-org ;
Sámiid% Vuorká-Dávvirat:Sámiid% Vuorká-Dávvi7r EATNAMAT-org ;
Vuođđovuonašjávrrit:Vuođđo^vuonaš^jáv'ri VARGGAT-plc ;
Áhppesduoddarat:Áhppes^duoddar EATNAMAT-plc ; !FIN
Áinnáidsullot:Áinnáid^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Ávvák:Ávvá BALAK-plc ; !village
Čoahpevárit:Čoahpe^várri ALEUHTAT-plc ; !FIN
Čoarvvek:Čoarvve BALAK-plc ;
